Washington statutes.
RCW 34.05.270

Agency websites for rule-making information.

Within existing resources, each state agency shall maintain a website that contains the agency's rule-making information. A direct link to the agency's rule-making page must be displayed on the agency's homepage. The rule-making website shall include the complete text of all proposed rules, emergency rules, and permanent rules proposed or adopted within the past twelve months, or include a direct link to the index page on the Washington State Register website that contains links to the complete text of all proposed rules, emergency rules, and permanent rules proposed or adopted within the past twelve months by that state agency. For proposed rules, the time, date, and place for the rule-making hearing and the procedures and timelines for submitting written comments and supporting data must be posted on the website.

[ 2009 c 93 s 1.]